Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,144
Sentencing court; powers; release on parole.

Upon successful completion of the incarceration work camp program, as determined by the Department of Correctional Services, the sentencing court may modify the offender's conditions of his or her sentence of probation, place the offender in an aftercare program, or discharge the offender. An offender placed in an incarceration work camp pursuant to a recommendation of the Board of Parole shall be released on parole upon successful completion, as determined by the board, of the incarceration work camp program.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB83, § 3.